Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4961.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LOCAL INITIATIVES SUPPORT CORPORATION - DULUTH.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Duluth office of the Local Initiatives Support Corporation to advance equitable economic development in northeast Minnesota by strengthening community-based organizations, enhancing commercial corridor vitality and economic development, and expanding access to resources and technical assistance through the Entrepreneurial Ecosystem Network. Grant money may be used for workshops, community and organizational networking and learning experiences, staff resources, leveraging additional grant dollars, and as lending capital. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end